Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 4. Reporting and Disposition of Personal Property.

Editor’s notes. —

With respect to the 2004 amendments made to sections within this article, under sec. 19, ch. 90, SLA 2004, the changes made by that 2004 Act apply to property that, on June 26, 2004, already was subject to a statutory provision amended by the Act or that, on or after June 26, 2004, becomes subject to a statutory provision amended by the Act.
See § 19, ch. 90, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 90, SLA 2004 (SB 231), amending sections within this article, see 2003 Senate Journal 1721 — 1722.

Sec. 34.45.280.
Report of abandoned personal property.

A person holding personal property, tangible or intangible, presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.430

, shall report to the department concerning the property as provided in this section.

The report must be made on a form bearing a notice that statements are made under penalty of unsworn falsification and must include

except with respect to traveler’s checks and money orders, the name, if known, and last known address, if any, of each person appearing from the records of the holder to be the owner of property, the value of which is $100 or more, presumed abandoned under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.430

and other statutes specifically made subject to this reporting requirement;

in the case of unclaimed money amounting to $100 or more, held or owing under a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract, the full name and last known address of the insured or annuitant and of the beneficiary or other person who is entitled to the proceeds according to the records of the insurance company holding or owing the funds;

in the case of the contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository or of other tangible personal property, a description of the property and the place where it is held and may be inspected by the department and any amounts owing to the holder;

the nature and identifying number, if any, or description of the property and the amount appearing from the records to be due; items of value under $100 each may be reported in the aggregate;

the date the property became payable, demandable, or returnable, and the date of the last transaction with the apparent owner with respect to the property; and

other information that the department prescribes by regulation as necessary for the administration of this chapter.

If the holder of property presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property is a successor to other persons who previously held the property for the apparent owner, or the holder has changed the holder’s name while holding the property, the holder shall file with the holder’s report all known names and addresses of each previous holder of the property.

The report required under (a) of this section shall be filed before November 1 of each year for unclaimed property held as of June 30 of that year. On written request by a person required to file a report, the commissioner may postpone the reporting date.

Not more than 120 days before filing the report required by this section, the holder in possession of property presumed abandoned and subject to custody as unclaimed property under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.430

shall send written notice to the apparent owner at the owner’s last known address informing the owner that the holder is in possession of property subject to this chapter if

the holder has in its records an address for the apparent owner that the holder believes to be accurate;

the claim of the apparent owner is not barred by the statute of limitations; and

the property has a value of $100 or more.

The requirements of this section apply to the holder of intangible property with a total aggregate value greater than $750 that is presumed abandoned under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

during the year preceding June 30 of each year. For purposes of determining total aggregate value under this subsection, the holder shall include all intangible property from prior years that was not reported under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 145 SLA 1996; am § 45 ch 65 SLA 1998; am § 10 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.290.
Requests for reports and examination of records.

The department may require a person who has not filed a report under AS

34.45.280

or a person who the department believes has filed an inaccurate, incomplete, or false report to file a verified report in a form specified by the department. The report must state whether the person is holding property reportable under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

, describe property not previously reported or as to which the department has made inquiry, and specifically identify and state the amounts of the property that may be in issue.

The department, at reasonable times and upon reasonable notice, may examine the records of any person to determine whether the person has complied with AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

. The department may conduct the examination even if the person believes it is not in possession of any property that must be reported, paid, or delivered under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

. The department may contract with any other person to conduct the examination on behalf of the department.

The department at reasonable times may examine the records of an agent, including a dividend disbursing agent or transfer agent, of a business association that is the holder of property presumed abandoned if the department has given the notice required by (b) of this section to both the association and the agent at least 90 days before the examination.

Documents and working papers obtained or compiled by the department or the department’s agents, employees, contractors, or designated representatives in the course of conducting an examination under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

are confidential and are not public records, but the documents and papers may be

used by the department in the course of an action to collect unclaimed property or otherwise enforce AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

;

used in joint examinations conducted with or under an agreement with another state, the federal government, or any other governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality;

produced under subpoena or court order; or

disclosed to the unclaimed property office of another state for that state’s use in circumstances equivalent to those described in this subsection, if the other state is bound to keep the documents and papers confidential.

If an examination of the records of a person results in the disclosure of property reportable under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

, the department may assess the cost of the examination against the holder at the rate of $200 a day for each examiner, or a greater amount that is reasonable and was incurred, but the assessment may not exceed the value of the property found to be reportable under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

. The cost of an examination made under (c) of this section may be assessed only against the business association.

If a holder does not maintain the records required by AS

34.45.300

and the records of the holder available for the periods subject to AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

are insufficient to permit the preparation of a report, the department may require the holder to report and pay to the department the amount the department reasonably estimates, on the basis of any available records of the holder or by any other reasonable method of estimation, should have been but was not reported.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 46 ch 65 SLA 1998; am § 45 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 11 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.300.
Retention of records.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, a holder required to file a report under AS

34.45.280

shall maintain the records containing the information required to be included in the report for 10 years after the holder files the report, unless a shorter period is provided by regulations adopted by the department.

A business association that sells, or provides such instruments to others for sale, in the state its traveler’s checks, money orders, or other similar written instruments, other than third-party bank checks on which the business association is directly liable, shall maintain a record of the instruments while they remain outstanding, indicating the state and date of issue, for three years after the date the property is reportable.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 12 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.310.
Notice and publication of lists of unclaimed property.

The department shall notify apparent owners of unclaimed property under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

in the manner and method set out in (b) of this section. In deciding whether to use an additional method specified in (b)(2) of this section, and which of those methods to use, the department shall employ the most cost-effective method available within its appropriations.

The department

shall notify all apparent owners of the unclaimed property in accordance with this section by means of posting on the department’s website on the Internet;

may use any of the following to provide additional notice to the apparent owners:

publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of the state in which the last known address of a person to be named in the notice is located or, if the address is unknown, in the area in which the holder has its principal place of business in the state;

individual contact by regular or electronic mail, or by telephone, if the department has current contact information on file under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

;

any other manner and method that the department considers effective for providing notice and publication under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

In its notice and publication under (b) of this section, the department shall provide the names of the apparent owners of the property and information regarding recovery of the unclaimed property.

The department is not required to publish in the notice an item of less than $100 in value.

This section does not apply to money payable on traveler’s checks, money orders, and other written instruments presumed abandoned under AS

34.45.140

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am §§ 5 — 7, 12 ch 145 SLA 1996; am § 13 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.320.
Payment or delivery of abandoned property.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, a person who is required to file a report under AS

34.45.280

, shall, at the time of filing the report under that section, pay or deliver to the administrator all of the property shown on the report and remaining unclaimed by the apparent owner. Upon written request showing good cause, the administrator may postpone the payment or delivery upon the terms or conditions the administrator considers necessary and appropriate. The property paid or delivered to the administrator must include all interest, dividends, increments, and accretions due, payable, or distributable on the property at the time of filing the report. If payment or delivery is postponed, the property paid or delivered to the administrator must include all interest, dividends, increments, and accretions due, payable, or distributable on the day that the property is paid or delivered to the administrator.

If the owner establishes the right to receive the abandoned property to the satisfaction of the holder before the property has been delivered or if it appears that the presumption of abandonment is erroneous, the holder need not pay or deliver the property to the department, and the property is no longer presumed abandoned. The holder shall file with the department a written explanation, made under penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree, of the proof of claim or of the error in the presumption of abandonment.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 145 SLA 1996.]

The holder of an equity interest under AS

34.45.200

shall deliver a duplicate certificate, or other evidence of ownership if the holder does not issue certificates of ownership, to the department. Upon delivery of a duplicate certificate to the department, the holder and a transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder in executing or delivering the duplicate certificate is relieved of all liability, in accordance with the provisions of AS

34.45.330

to every person, including a person acquiring the original certificate or the duplicate of the certificate issued to the department, for loss or damage resulting to a person by the issuance and delivery to the department of the duplicate certificate.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am §§ 8, 12 ch 145 SLA 1996; am § 47 ch 65 SLA 1998; am § 14 ch 90 SLA 2004; am § 19 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Sec. 34.45.330.
Custody by state.

Upon the payment or delivery of property to the department, the state assumes custody and responsibility for the safekeeping of the property. A person who pays or delivers property to the department in good faith is relieved of all liability to the extent of the value of the property paid or delivered for a claim existing at the time of the payment or delivery or that may arise or be made with respect to the property after the payment or delivery.

A holder who has paid money to the department under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.430

may make payment to a person appearing to the holder to be entitled to payment. Upon receiving proof of payment from the holder and proof that the payee was entitled to the payment, the department shall promptly reimburse the holder for the payment without imposing a fee or other charge. If reimbursement is sought for a payment made on a negotiable instrument, including a traveler’s check or money order, the department shall reimburse the holder under this subsection when the holder files proof that the instrument was presented and that payment was made to a person who appeared to the holder to be entitled to payment. The department shall reimburse the holder for payment made under this subsection even if the holder paid a person whose claim was barred under AS

34.45.430

.

A holder who has delivered property other than money to the department under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.430

may reclaim the property if it is still in the possession of the department, without payment of a fee or other charge, upon filing proof that the owner has claimed the property from the holder.

The department may accept the holder’s affidavit as sufficient proof of the facts that entitle the holder to recover money and property under this section.

If a holder pays or delivers property to the department in good faith and another person subsequently claims the property from the holder or another state claims the property under the laws of the other state relating to escheat or unclaimed property, the department, upon receiving written notice of the claim, shall defend the holder against the claim and indemnify the holder against liability on the claim.

Property removed from a safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository is received by the department subject to the holder’s right under this subsection to be reimbursed for the actual cost of the opening and to a valid lien or contract providing for the holder to be reimbursed for unpaid rent or storage charges. For charges other than the actual cost of the opening, the department shall reimburse or pay the holder an amount no greater than the value of the property recovered less the department’s selling cost.

For the purposes of this section, “good faith” means that

payment or delivery was made in a reasonable attempt to comply with this chapter;

the person delivering the property was not a fiduciary then in breach of trust in respect to the property, and had a reasonable basis for believing, based on the facts then known to the person, that the property was abandoned for the purposes of this chapter; and

there is no showing that the records under which the delivery was made did not meet reasonable commercial standards of practice in the industry.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986; am § 15 ch 90 SLA 2004)

Sec. 34.45.340.
Crediting of dividends, interest, or increments to owner’s account.

Except as provided under AS

34.45.360(d)

for appreciation of securities, if property other than money is paid or delivered to the department under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.430

, the owner is entitled to receive from the department dividends, interest, or other increments realized or accruing on the property at or before the department’s liquidation or conversion of the property into money.

History.

(§ 11 ch 133 SLA 1986)